Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.90.020

Approval of foreign degree-granting institution as branch campus.

A foreign degree-granting institution that submits evidence satisfactory to the council of its authorized status in its country of domicile and its intent to establish an educational facility in the state is entitled to operate a branch campus as defined in RCW 28B.90.010. Upon receipt of the satisfactory evidence, the council may certify that the branch campus of the foreign degree-granting institution is approved to operate in the state under this chapter, for as long as the foreign degree-granting institution retains its authorized status in its country of domicile.

[ 2012 c 229 s 555; 1999 c 85 s 1; 1993 c 181 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.